Maryland, session 2026, HB1404.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 7–510(a) through (i) of Article – Public Utilities of the Annotated Code of
Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 7–510(b) through (j), respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–219.1.
(A) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW AND SUBJECT TO
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS THAT PRODUCE
ENERGY FROM NATURAL GAS MAY BE CONSTRUCTED, PERMITTED, AND OPERATED
IN THE STATE.
(B) A PERSON CONSTRUCTING AN ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM UNDER
THIS SECTION SHALL COMPLY WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE RELATING
TO REQUIREMENTS TO OBTAIN:
(1) A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY; OR
(2) COMMISSION APPROVAL FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF THE
GENERATING SYSTEM.
7–510.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “PREMIER CREDIT RATING AGENCY” MEANS A NATIONALLY
RECOGNIZED STATISTICAL RATING ORGANIZATION THAT IS:
(I) APPROVED BY THE U.S. SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE
COMMISSION UNDER THE CREDIT RATING AGENCY REFORM ACT OF 2006; AND
(II) ONE OF THE TOP TWO NATIONALLY RECOGNIZED
STATISTICAL RATING ORGANIZATIONS BY MARKET SHARE.
(3) “RATING ASSESSMENT” MEANS A WRITTEN ANALYSIS THAT:

HOUSE BILL 1404 3
(I) IS PERFORMED BY A PREMIER CREDIT RATING AGENCY; AND
(II) ASSESSES THE LIKELY IMPACT OF A TRANSACTION OR
TRANSACTIONS ON AN INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY’S
CREDITWORTHINESS.
(b) (1) Subject to subsection [(b)] (C) of this section, the phased
implementation of customer choice shall be implemented as follows:
(i) on July 1, 2000, one–third of the residential class in the State of
each electric company shall have the opportunity for customer choice;
(ii) on January 1, 2001, the entire industrial class and the entire
commercial class in the State of each electric company shall have the opportunity for
customer choice;
(iii) on July 1, 2001, two–thirds of the residential class in the State
of each electric company shall have the opportunity for customer choice;
(iv) on July 1, 2002, all customers of each electric company shall have
the opportunity for customer choice; and
(v) by July 1, 2003, under a separate schedule adopted by the
Commission, all customers of each electric cooperative shall have the opportunity for
customer choice.
(c) For good cause shown and if the Commission finds the action to be in the
public interest, the Commission may:
(2) accelerate any of the other implementation dates and phase–in
percentages in subsection [(a)] (B) of this section.
(d) (2) (ii) A customer is considered to have chosen the standard offer
service if the customer:
1. is not allowed to choose an electricity supplier under the
phase in of customer choice in subsection [(a)] (B) of this section;
(6) (I) SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBTITLE 2 OF THIS
TITLE, AN INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY OR ELECTRICITY SUPPLIER MAY:
1. CONSTRUCT, ACQUIRE, OR LEASE, AND OPERATE, ITS
OWN GENERATING FACILITIES; AND

HOUSE BILL 1404
2. CONSTRUCT, ACQUIRE, OR LEASE, AND OPERATE, ITS
OWN TRANSMISSION FACILITIES NECESSARY TO INTERCONNECT THE GENERATING
FACILITIES WITH THE ELECTRIC SYSTEM.
(II) [In] IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT IT IS
NECESSARY IN order to meet long–term, anticipated demand in the State for standard
offer service and other electricity supply, the Commission may require or allow, SUBJECT
TO APPROPRIATE COST RECOVERY, an investor–owned electric company to:
1. construct, acquire, or lease, and operate, its own
generating facilities[,]; and
2. CONSTRUCT, ACQUIRE, OR LEASE, AND OPERATE, ITS
OWN transmission facilities necessary to interconnect the generating facilities with the
electric [grid, subject to appropriate cost recovery] SYSTEM.
(III) AN INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY THAT IS
REQUIRED OR ALLOWED TO CONSTRUCT, ACQUIRE, OR LEASE, AND OPERATE, A
GENERATING FACILITY UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY
RECOVER ALL PRUDENTLY INCURRED GENERATION INVESTMENTS AND COSTS:
1. INCLUDING:
A. ACQUISITION, CAPITAL, CONSTRUCTION, OPERATION,
MAINTENANCE, FINANCING, FUEL, AND CARRYING COSTS; AND
B. ANY OTHER RELATED INVESTMENTS AND COSTS,
INCLUDING INVESTMENTS AND COSTS THAT BECAME STRANDED FOR ANY REASON;
AND
2. THROUGH ELECTRIC RATES OR, SUBJECT TO
COMMISSION APPROVAL, A NONBYPASSABLE SURCHARGE.
(IV) AN INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY THAT IS
REQUIRED OR ALLOWED TO CONSTRUCT, ACQUIRE, OR LEASE, AND OPERATE, ITS
OWN GENERATING FACILITY UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH AND
IS A MEMBER OF A REGIONAL TRANSMISSION ORGANIZATION MAY:
1. OPERATE A GENERATION ASSET IN THE MARKETS OF
THAT ORGANIZATION; AND

HOUSE BILL 1404 5
2. APPLY ANY NET REVENUES EARNED FROM
PARTICIPATION IN THE MARKETS OF THAT ORGANIZATION AGAINST THE
OPERATING COSTS OF THE ASSET.
(V) A COMMISSION ORDER REQUIRING OR ALLOWING AN
INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY TO CONSTRUCT, ACQUIRE, OR LEASE, AND
OPERATE, ITS OWN GENERATING FACILITY WITH A NAMEPLATE CAPACITY GREATER
THAN 2 MEGAWATTS MAY NOT GO INTO EFFECT UNTIL:
1. THE INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY:
A. IDENTIFIES A PREMIER CREDIT RATING AGENCY;
B. PROVIDES A COPY OF THE ORDER, ALONG WITH ANY
TERMS, CONDITIONS, AND CONTINGENCIES, TO THE AGENCY; AND
C. SEEKS A RATING ASSESSMENT FROM THE AGENCY;
AND
2. THE PREMIER CREDIT RATING AGENCY PROVIDES A
RATING ASSESSMENT FINDING THAT THE TERMS OF THE COMMISSION’S ORDER ARE
UNLIKELY TO BE NEGATIVE FOR THE CREDITWORTHINESS OF THE
INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY AND ITS AFFILIATES.
(9) (ii) If an electric cooperative determines that total electric rates for
residential customers are anticipated to increase by more than 20% in a 12–month period
resulting from an increase in the cost of generation, the electric cooperative shall survey its
membership to determine whether to make a request to the Commission to initiate a
proceeding under subsection [(a)] (B) of this section.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The General Assembly supports the development of additional nuclear energy
in the State, including small modular reactors and the combination of nuclear energy and
energy produced from natural gas, for reliable clean energy in the State.
(b) The General Assembly encourages PJM Interconnection, LLC to provide an
expedited interconnection process for new thermal generation resources in the State.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.